morph.lexc
! -lI is productive. The simple example is 
!           şeker `sugar' -> şeker-li `[something] with sugar' 
!    some forms are lexicalized, but in most cases semantics is clear.
!
! -lI makes nouns or adjective from nouns or adjectives, although
!     less likely, it may also make adverbs.
!       N -> N : atlı
!       N -> J : akıllı
!       J -> J : mavili
!
!   Here, we make use of the fact that adjectives can become a noun
!   with a zero derivation, and assume that -lI only derives
!   adjectives from nouns. This may not be too far from reality
!   either. Since the first example above `atlı' is also an adjective,
!   and the noun form has a similar sense as any other noun derived
!   from adjectives. This is less clear for J->J case, but it is more
!   reasonable to assume that `mavi' in the example above refers to
!   the color, hence it must start as a noun, likely by derivation from 
!   the adjective.
!
LEXICON   D_lI
%<li%>:l^I@MB         DerivJCont;
%<li%>:l^I@MB         DerivACont;

! -sIz behaves almost exactly like -lI, with the opposite meaning.
!           şeker `sugar' -> şeker-siz `[something] without sugar' 
!
! Further, -sIz tends to appear after some nominal suffixes, for
! example: 'çocuk-lar-ım-sız'. In principle, it can attach wherever 
! a case suffix can (which may raise the question whether it may 
! function as a case suffix or not---`abessive case'?). For most of
! these cases -lI may be plausible too, but it sounds less likely,
! possibly because the instrumental/commutative suffix has a similar
! function. We do not allow -lI to combine that freely, unless/until data
! dictates so.
!
! it is more likely for -sIz to form adverbs 
!       N -> N : kitap-sız (lexicalized)
!       N -> J : akılsız 
!       N -> A : arabasız
LEXICON   D_sIz
%<siz%>:s^Iz@MB       DerivJCont;
%<siz%>:s^Iz@MB       DerivACont;

! -lIK makes nouns from nouns, adjectives adverbs
!       N -> N: kitap-lık, kral-lık
!       J -> N: iyi-lik
!       A -> N: yavaş-lık
!
LEXICON   ND_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivJCont;
LEXICON   JD_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;
LEXICON   AD_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;

! -arası `between' forms some compund adjectives from 
!        plural nouns this is quite productive.
!        uluslar-arası, bölgeler-arası, ilkokullar-arası
!
!
LEXICON   D_arasi
%<arasi%>:arası@MB            DerivJCont;

! -(I)mtrak mainly attaches adjectives relating to colors and
! tastes, but it may also attach to other adjectives an nouns.
! Unusual examples from the web: devlet-imtrak, gizem-li-mtrak
!
! TODO: It seems if the stem ends with `m' the suffix may become -trak.
!       film-trak, sağlam-trak

LEXICON D_mtrak
%<imtrak%>:^(I)mtrak@MB              DerivJCont;

! -(I)msI also makes adjectives from nouns and adjectives.
!           mavi-msi, tatlı-msı, gül-ümsü
!
LEXICON   D_imsi
%<imsi%>:^(I)ms^I@MB     DerivJCont;

! -sI also makes adjectives from nouns.
!           ot-su, sümük-sü, kadın-sı etc.
! This seems to be used only with nouns ending with a consononant.
!
LEXICON   D_si
%<si%>:s^I@MB     DerivJCont;

!
LEXICON   D_imsi
%<imsi%>:^(I)ms^I@MB     DerivJCont;

! Dimunitive suffixes.
!
! TODO: not every nouns combines with every diminutive marker
! TODO: some cases like 'küçücük'.
!
LEXICON   Dimin
%<dim%:cIk%>:^C^NS^I^k@MB           DerivNCont;
%<dim%:cAk%>:c^NS^A^k@MB            DerivNCont;
%<dim%:IcAk%>:^NS^(I)c^NS^A^k@MB    DerivNCont;
%<dim%:AcAk%>:^NS^(A)c^NS^A^k@MB    DerivNCont;
%<dim%:cAgIz%>:c^Ağ^Iz@MB           DerivNCont;

! -CI generally marks occupation, "someone who does or sells something"
!      N->N : şeker-ci , 
!      N->J : geri-ci
!
!   TODO/CHECK: again assuming that it only derives adjectives is an
!               option. then adj. might become a noun by zero-deriv.
!   TODO/CHECK: it also derives nouns from verbs (e.g., ögrenci) but
!               these should be lexicalized.
LEXICON   D_CI
%<ci%>:^C^I@MB     DerivNCont;
%<ci%>:^C^I@MB   DerivJCont;

! -CA makes adverbs from nouns, pronouns, adjectives and adverbs, and in a 
!     restrictive case it derives adjectives from numbers.
!     it also derives nouns from nouns in some cases: Alman-ca.
!       N->A: çocuk-ça
!       P->A: ben-ce
!       A->A: hızlı-ca  `somewhat fast'
!       J->J: büyük-çe  `somewhat big'
!       M->J: on-lar-ca
!  It also derives adjectives from adjectives and adverbs from
!  adverbs, where it changes the degree
!
! Additionally, -CAnA is a colloquial form of -CA,
!  but it seems to attach to only adverbs and adjectives to make
!  mainly adverbs 'hızlıcana okudu', 'güzelcene uyu şimdi', but also
!  adjectives in some cases 'kalıncana bir kitap', 'karışıkçana birşey'
!
LEXICON   Deriv_MACA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivNCont;
LEXICON   ND_CAlanguage
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivNCont;
LEXICON   ND_CA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivACont;
LEXICON   JD_CA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivJCont;
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivACont;
%<cana%>:^C^An^A@MB DerivJCont;
%<cana%>:^C^An^A@MB DerivACont;
LEXICON   AD_CA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivACont;
%<cana%>:^C^An^A@MB DerivACont;
LEXICON   MD_CA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivJCont;
LEXICON   PD_CA
%<ca%>:^C^A@MB DerivACont;


!
! -(y)sA/ise (besides being the conditional copula) functions as a
! discourse connective. The difference is sometimes subtle but
! important:
!    cond: EvdeYSE, telefonu açardı "he'd answer the phone IF he was at home"
!    Cnj:adv: EvdeYSE, hiç çalışamıyorum "At home, ON THE OTHER HAND, I
!                                           can never work"

LEXICON CliticSA
%<ise%>%<Cnj%:adv%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       ENDLEX;

! -(y)IcI makes adjectives (and nouns) from verbs.
!       bulaşıcı, görücü, yapıcı
!
!   TODO/CHECK: these may all be lexicalized.
!
LEXICON D_yIcI
%<yici%>:^(y)^Ic^I@MB      DerivJCont;

! -CIl makes adjectives from nouns
!       N->J insancıl,
!
! it also makes nouns (e.g., balıkçıl) but we, again, assume that this 
! goes through the adjective path
!
!  N->N 

LEXICON D_CIl
%<cil%>:^C^Il@MB              DerivJCont;


! -gil makes nouns from nouns. 
!   `  it is normally attached to proper names (Ahmet-gil) and nouns 
!      specifying family members after possessive suffixes (anne-m-gil).
!      it also occurs with common nouns (bakla-gil), but these should
!      al be lexicalized.
!
LEXICON D_gil
%<gil%>:gil@MB       DerivNCont;

! -DIr  makes adverbial phrases from quantified nouns specifying time 
!       üç gündür, bir zamandır ....
!
! TODO: tag is the same as other <dir>
!
LEXICON D_dir
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB      DerivACont;


! -lArI makes adverbs from time adverbials `akşamları', `hafta
! sonları' ...
!
! We currently allow any adverb marked as AdvTime to be used with this
! derivation, although the set of adverbs that combines with this is 
! slightly different than the ones that combines with -ki
!
LEXICON D_lArI
%<leri%>:l^Ar^I@MB      DerivACont;


! -lIğInA is another suffix that attaches to the time expressions. It
! roughly translates to 'for', 'birkaç günlüğüne' (for a few days)
!
LEXICON D_lIGInA
%<ligine%>%<Adv%>:l^Iğ^In^A@MB    ENDLEX;

! -lA is productive, and makes verbs from nouns
!
!       tuz-la, şeker-le, kuru-la ....
!       it also attaches to some(all/most?) onomatopoeic words.
!
!  NOTE: although it is productive, the N->V derivation causes a lot 
!        of ambiguous analyses. it is commented out.
!
!LEXICON ND_lA
!%<la%>:l^A       DerivVCont;
LEXICON D_lA
%<la%>:l^A@MB       DerivVCont;

! -lAn makes verbs from nouns and adjectives
!
!       N->V: av-lan, N->J: kuru-lan
!
LEXICON ND_lAn
%<lan%>:l^An@MB       DerivVCont;
LEXICON JD_lAn
%<lan%>:l^An@MB       DerivVCont;

! -lAş makes verbs from nouns and adjectives
!
!       N->V: mektup-laş, N->J: güzel-laş
!
!   TODO/CHECK: these may all be lexicalized verbs
LEXICON ND_lAS
%<las%>:l^Aş@MB       DerivVCont;
LEXICON JD_lAS
%<las%>:l^Aş@MB       DerivVCont;

! -(y)Iş makes nouns from verbs
!       yürüyüş, duruş, bakış
!
!   TODO: these probably are also lexicalized
!
LEXICON D_yIS
%<yis%>:^(y)^Iş@MB   DerivNCont;

! -mA makes nouns and adjectives from verbs
!    V->N: ödeme, arama, kıyma, kesme
!    V->J: kıyma, kesme, dökme, bunama
! these probably are also lexicalized, and this creates a lot of
! ambiguity (-mA is also a subordinating suffix). So it's out.
!
! LEXICON D_mA
! %<ma%>:m^A@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<ma%>:m^A@MB   DerivJCont;


! non-productive derivation -(I)nC
! V -> N: bas-ınç
! V -> J: kıskan-ç
! N -> J: ilgi-nç
! For stems ending with 'n', the form is '-C', we let them pass here
! and drop In after a a stem ending with 'n'
! TODO: öd(e)-ünç?
!
! LEXICON D_inc
! %<inc%>:^(I)n^c@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<inc%>:^(I)n^c@MB   DerivJCont;

! non-productive(?) derivation -(I)K
! V -> N: kay-ık
! V -> J: sol-uk
! N -> N/J: orta-k
!
! LEXICON D_ik
! %<ik%>:^(I)^k@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<ik%>:^(I)^k@MB   DerivJCont;

! non-productive derivation -(A)K
! V -> N: kay-ak
! V -> J: kork-ak
!
! seems to be realted to -(I)K above, but the distinction is not
! clearcut
!
! LEXICON D_ek
! %<ek%>:^(A)^k@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<ek%>:^(A)^k@MB   DerivJCont;

! non-productive derivation -(A)y
! V -> N: den-ey
! V -> J: düş-ey
!
! LEXICON D_ey
! %<ey%>:^(A)y@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<ey%>:^(A)y@MB   DerivJCont;

! non-productive derivation -(A)v
! V -> N: gör-ev
!
! LEXICON D_ev
! %<ev%>:^(A)v@MB   DerivNCont;

! non-productive derivation -GIn
! V -> N: bas-kın, sür-gün
! V -> J: yor-gun, şaş-kın
!
! LEXICON D_gin
! %<gin%>:^G^In@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<gin%>:^G^In@MB   DerivJCont;

! non-productive derivation -GI
! V -> N: sil-gi, sev-gi
!
! LEXICON D_gi
! %<gi%>:^G^I@MB   DerivNCont;

! non-productive derivation -(A)m
! V -> N: kur-am, tut-am, dön-em
! N -> N: ön-em
!
! LEXICON D_em
! %<em%>:^(A)m@MB   DerivNCont;

! non-productive derivation -(I)m/-(y)Im
! V -> N: dene-yim, bak-ım, anla-m, bil-im
!
! TODO/CHECK: this seems to also attach passive or reflexive forms
! (geri-l-im)
!
! LEXICON D_im
! %<im%>:^(I)m@MB   DerivNCont;
! %<yim%>:^(y)^Im@MB   DerivNCont;

! -sAl makes adjectives from nouns
!       bilimsel, tarihsel, duşsel...
!
LEXICON D_sAl
%<sal%>:s^Al@MB  DerivJCont;

! -Al is similar to -sAl
!       yasal, yerel, cinsel, ilkel...
!
! LEXICON D_al
! %<al%>:^Al@MB  DerivJCont;


LEXICON JN_zero
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<N%>:@MB   Ncont;
#else
                  Ncont;
#endif

LEXICON AN_zero
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<N%>:@MB   Ncont;
#else
                  Ncont;
#endif

! This may be a way for avoiding duplicated adj/adv entries int he
! lexicon
!LEXICON AJ_zero
!%<%0%>%<Adj%>:@MB   AdjCont;

LEXICON MN_zero
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<N%>:@MB   Ncont;
#else
                  Ncont;
#endif

!
!
!
LEXICON DerivNCont
%<N%>:0@MB       Ncont; ! this gives unlimited application of derivation
!%<N%>:0@MB      Ninfl;   ! only one derivation after root.

LEXICON DerivJCont
%<Adj%>:0@MB    AdjCont; ! this gives unlimited application of derivation
!%<Adj%>:0@MB   ENDLEX;   ! only one derivation after root.

LEXICON DerivACont
%<Adv%>:0@MB    AdvCont; ! this gives unlimited application of derivation
!%<Adv%>:0@MB   ENDLEX;   ! only one derivation after root.

LEXICON DerivVCont
%<V%>:0@MB      VCont; ! this gives unlimited application of derivation
!%<V%>:0@MB     Vinfl; ! only one derivation after root.

LEXICON ENDLEX #;
